Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5825YH (4) 91 je/ns H.F. 2383 Section 1. Section 135C.35, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. The department, in consultation with 3 the board of nursing, shall establish continuing education 4 requirements that allow a person to maintain dual certification 5 as a certified nurse aide and an inspector under this chapter. 6 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 135C.35D Health care facility 7 inspector incentive grant program. 8 1. The department shall establish a health care facility 9 inspector incentive grant program to provide funding for 10 certified nurse aides to obtain necessary training to qualify 11 as inspectors under this chapter. 12 2. Under the program, the department shall award grants 13 of up to two thousand dollars to qualified applicants, with 14 grant amounts based on an applicantâs number of years of 15 employment as a certified nurse aide and the amount of training 16 necessary for the applicant to qualify as an inspector under 17 this chapter. 18 3. The department shall establish eligibility requirements, 19 award criteria, and application and other necessary procedures 20 for the program. 21 4. a. A health care facility inspector incentive grant 22 program fund is established in the state treasury under the 23 control of the department. The fund shall consist of moneys 24 appropriated to the fund by the general assembly, which may 25 include penalties collected by the department under this 26 chapter. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department 27 to award grants under this section. 28 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund at the 29 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 30 available for expenditure for the purposes designated for 31 subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, 32 subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall 33 be credited to the fund. 34 5. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 35 -1- LSB 5825YH (4) 91 je/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2383 to administer this section. 1 Sec. 3. Section 260C.14, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 2 following new subsection: 3 NEW SUBSECTION . 27. a. Establish a certificate program 4 for long-term care quality and inspection support. The 5 program must consist of at least thirty but no more than forty 6 contact hours and include but not be limited to the subjects 7 of inspection processes, abuse and neglect prevention control, 8 and incident reporting. The certificate must be structured to 9 supplement the community collegeâs certified nursing assistant 10 training program. The board shall pursue partnerships with 11 nursing homes and other care facilities to include practical 12 training in the program. 13 b. The board shall pursue relevant state and federal grants 14 and other funding opportunities, including but not limited to 15 the Medicaid quality incentive program, to establish and expand 16 the program. 17 Sec. 4. IMPLEMENTATION OF ACT. The moneys generated as 18 a result of the enactment of this Act are intended to cover 19 the costs of any state mandate included in this Act and this 20 specification of state funding shall be deemed to meet all the 21 state funding-related requirements of section 25B.2, subsection 22 3, and no additional state funding shall be necessary for the 23 full implementation of this Act by, and enforcement of this Act 24 against, all affected political subdivisions. 25